North Dakota, session 69, SB2340.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT STUDY - FIRE SERVICE REGIONAL RESPONSE
MODEL.
1. During the 2025-26 interim, the legislative management shall study the evolving fire service
operational and response needs of the state. The study must include an examination of the:
a. Coordination of efforts of existing state resources for improved fire emergency service
organization, distribution, mobilization, training, and oversight.
b. Creation of fire service regional response teams.
c. Establishment of authority for response, standardized training, wildland-urban interface
fire prevention codes, emergency response operational initiatives and responsibilities.
d. Evaluation of existing staffing abilities to cross-train, provide further services, provide
backfill during extended or complex emergencies, minimum training requirements, staff
firefighting authorities, firefighting benefits, necessary equipment, and structural needs.
e. Identification and implementation of a restructure of fiscal support for state and local fire
service in North Dakota, reducing the dependency on local property tax.
f. A review of changes necessary to state laws and administrative rules to implement a
unified model.
2. The study must include consultation with state fire marshal, the North Dakota firefighter's
association, the North Dakota forest service, the department of emergency services, the North
Dakota fire chief's association, the department of career and technical education, and other
stakeholders. The legislative management may contract with a consultant to carry out this
study. The legislative management shall report the findings and recommendations, together
with any legislation required to implement the recommendations, to the seventieth legislative
assembly.

S. B. NO. 2340 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2340.
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
House Vote: Yeas 90 Nays 1 Absent 3
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State